Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE L. COURT PROFESSIONS REGULATION

CHAPTER 151. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 151.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subtitle:

(1) "Certification" means a certification issued by the commission.

(2) "Commission" means the Judicial Branch Certification Commission.

(3) "Director" means the administrative director of the office.

(4) "License" means a license issued by the commission.

(5) "Office" means the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System.

(6) "Registration" means a registration issued by the commission.

(7) "Regulated person" means a person, firm, or other business entity, who holds a certification, registration, or license issued by the commission.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 42 (S.B. 966), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2014.

Redesignated from Government Code, Subtitle K, Title 2 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(21), eff. September 1, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 516 (S.B. 43), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.